Washington statutes.
RCW 43.280.040

Organizations eligible.

Local governments, nonprofit community groups, and nonprofit treatment providers including organizations which provide services, such as emergency housing, counseling, and crisis intervention shall, among others, be eligible for grants under the program established in RCW 43.280.020.

[ 1990 c 3 s 1205.]